Utah statutes.
57-19-17.   Administrative procedures.

(1)  The director may summarily deny an application for registration under any of the provisions of Section 57-19-13 or 57-19-16.  If a registration is denied, the applicant may, within 10 days after receipt of notice of the denial, request a hearing before an administrative law judge.  The director shall schedule the hearing within 30 days after receipt of the applicant's request and give notice of the hearing in writing to the applicant, specifying the reasons for denial of the registration.  If, as a result of the hearing, it is determined that the applicant is qualified to be registered, the registration shall be issued.

(2)  Before an existing registration is suspended or revoked, or a fine imposed, the director shall schedule a hearing before an administrative law judge and give notice in writing to the affected person as prescribed in Title 13, Chapter 1, and the rules of procedure for hearings before the Department of Commerce.  If, as a result of the hearing, the administrative law judge finds that there has been a violation of this chapter, the registration shall be suspended or revoked, or a fine imposed, by written order of the director in concurrence with the executive director.

(3)  The developer or salesperson has the right to appear at the hearing, in person or by counsel, to be heard and to examine witnesses appearing in connection with the complaint.  At the hearing, all witnesses shall be sworn by the administrative law judge, and stenographic notes or a tape recording of the proceeding shall be taken and filed as a part of the record in the case.  Any party to the proceeding shall be furnished a copy of the stenographic notes or tape recording at a reasonable cost.  The administrative law judge shall render a decision within 60 days after the completion of the hearing.  The executive director and the director shall concurrently make the final decision and promptly notify the parties to the proceedings, in writing, of the ruling, order, or decision.

(4)  The developer or salesperson, or any person aggrieved, may appeal any adverse ruling, order, or decision of the executive director and the director to the district court for the county in which the hearing was held, within 30 days from the date of service of notice of the ruling, order, or decision upon him.  At the time of filing the notice of appeal, the appellant shall file with the notice a bond for costs on appeal in the amount of $200, conditioned to secure the payment of costs if the appeal is dismissed or the judgment affirmed.



Amended by Chapter 225, 1989 General Session

